src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
                                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+ConNeg:%»ed%>%^DISIMPh                FINAL1           ;
                                   +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+VGen:%»ed%>%^DISIMPen               FINAL1           ;
!                                   +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Act:%»ed%>immie                    FINAL1           ;
                                    +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Ger:%»ed%>%^DISIMPeminie           FINAL1           ;
                                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+PrfPrc:%»ed%>amme                     FINAL1           ;
        +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^3sUMLa   FINAL1           ;
            +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>i          FINAL1           ;
   +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^DISIMPi  FINAL1           ;
                    +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Inf:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>edh        FINAL1           ;
                   +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+VGen:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>en         FINAL1           ;
!                   +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Act:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme        FINAL1           ;
                    +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ger:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>eminie     FINAL1           ;
                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+PrfPrc:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme        FINAL1           ;
                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+ConNeg:%»ed%»%^adteUMLadt%>0h         FINAL1           ;
!                                   +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldihkie+A:%»eldihk                       ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP ;
!                                    +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldahke+N:%»eldahk                       flagLDAHKE           ;
!                           +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Cmp/SgNom:%»eldh                         R                ;
!                              +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom:%»eldh                         FINAL1           ;
!                     +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%»eld                          FINAL1           ; !


LEXICON EEREDH_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          :er   GÖÖLEDH_TV   ;
 +Err/Orth:r    GÖÖLEDH_TV   ;
 +Err/Orth:rad  GOLTELIDH_TV ;
 +Err/Orth:erad GOLTELIDH_TV ;

LEXICON EEREDH_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          :er   GÖÖLEDH_IV   ;
 +Err/Orth:r    GÖÖLEDH_IV   ;
 +Err/Orth:rad  GOLTELIDH_IV ;
 +Err/Orth:erad GOLTELIDH_IV ;
 
 


! ---- Verbal derivation sublexica ----
LEXICON ÅARAJEHTEDH_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                    +V+TV:              ÅARAJEHTEDH ;
! +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+Uml:%»%^1UMLasovv SOVVEDH     ;
!      +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML   VÅÅJNEDH    ;


LEXICON ÅARAJEHTEDH_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                    +V+IV:              ÅARAJEHTEDH  ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL+Uml:%»%^1UMLasovv IV_PASSIVE_L ;! Finnes denne?
!      +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML   IV_PASSIVE_S ;! finnes denne? jeg ble kalt for aahka= manne aahkastahtajovvim?- aahkastehtedh= å kalle for aahka


LEXICON ÅARAJEHTEDH   !!≈ * **@CODE@** row A - Group I
            +Ind+Prs+Uml:%>%^1UMLa         V-I-PRS-SG         ; ! class I special
                +Ind+Prs:%>ie              VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;
            +Ind+Prt+Uml:%>%^iUML          VSUF-PRT           ;
                  +Imprt:%>                VSUF-EVEN-IMP      ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
                    +Inf:%>edh             FINAL1             ;
                 +ConNeg:%>ieh             FINAL1             ;
                   +VGen:%>ien             FINAL1             ;
! +Act:%>eme           FINAL1 ;
                    +Ger:%>ieminie         FINAL1             ;
                 +PrsPrc:%>ije             flagFINAL1             ;
! +PrsPrc:%>ijes        FINAL1 ;
             +PrfPrc+Uml:%>%^1UMLeme       FINAL1             ;
! row F trigger for Umlaut Prt
! Derivations
! -----------
         +Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»iej  flagIJE_ODD            ;
 +Der3+Der/NomAg+N+Err/Orth:%»ij  flagIJE_ODD            ;
        +Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»iem  flagNomActOdd          ;
           +Der1+Der/les+A:%»%^1UML          LES_LASSE_ie       ;
       +Der3+Der/InchL+V:%»iegået          GÅETEDH            ;
       +Der3+Der/ahtje+V:%»iejahtj         AHTJE              ;

LEXICON BUARADEHTEDH  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                          +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Uml+Sg3:%>%^1UMLa                 FINAL1    ; ! class I special
                          +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3:%>%^iUMLi                 FINAL1    ;
                  +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3+Err/Orth:%>%^iUML%^DISIMPi         FINAL1    ;
! +V+IV+Imprt:%>              VSUF-EVEN-IMP ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
                                      +V+IV+Inf:%>edh                     FINAL1    ;
                                   +V+IV+ConNeg:%>ieh                     FINAL1    ;
                                     +V+IV+VGen:%>ien                     FINAL1    ;
! +V+IV+Act:%>eme           FINAL1 ;
                                      +V+IV+Ger:%>ieminie                 FINAL1    ;
                               +V+IV+PrfPrc+Uml:%>%^1UMLeme               FINAL1    ;
! row F trigger for Umlaut Prt
! Derivations
! -----------
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»iej@C.NeedNoun@     IJE_ODD ;
                          +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»iem  flagNomActOdd ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/les+A:%»%^1UML LES_LASSE_ie ;
         +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Uml+Sg3:%»iegået%>%^1UMLa         FINAL1    ;
         +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3:%»iegået%>%^iUMLi         FINAL1    ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»iegået%>%^iUML%^DISIMPi FINAL1    ;
                     +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Inf:%»iegået%>edh             FINAL1    ;
                  +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+ConNeg:%»iegået%>ieh             FINAL1    ;
                    +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+VGen:%»iegået%>ien             FINAL1    ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Act:%»iegået%>eme           FINAL1 ;
                     +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ger:%»iegået%>ieminie         FINAL1    ;
              +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+PrfPrc+Uml:%»iegået%>%^1UMLeme       FINAL1    ;
         +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»iejahtj%>%^3sUMLa       FINAL1    ;
             +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»iejahtj%>i              FINAL1    ;
     +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»iejahtj%>%^DISIMPi      FINAL1    ;
                     +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Inf:%»iejahtj%>edh            FINAL1    ;
                    +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+VGen:%»iejahtj%>en             FINAL1    ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Act:%»iejahtj%>eme      FINAL1 ;
                     +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ger:%»iejahtj%>eminie         FINAL1    ;
                  +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+PrfPrc:%»iejahtj%>eme            FINAL1    ;
                  +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+ConNeg:%»iejahtj%>0h             FINAL1    ;


LEXICON GOEGKERDADTEDH_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                +V+TV:            GOEGKERDADTEDH ;
 +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL:e%»sovv     SOVVEDH        ;
!  +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML VÅÅJNEDH       ;

LEXICON GOEGKERDADTEDH_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                +V+IV:            GOEGKERDADTEDH ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL:e%»sovv     IV_PASSIVE_L   ;
!  +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML IV_PASSIVE_S   ;
